Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-904.02
Indian country, defined.

Indian country has the same meaning as in 18 U.S.C. 1151, as such section existed on January 1, 2024.

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 9.